Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,188
Matching funds; receipt; conditions.

The right to receive matching funds under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act:

(1) Shall be subject to the limitations provided in the act;

(2) Shall be subject to funds being appropriated by the Legislature; and

(3) Shall not be transferable.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 104.